Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1903
Definitions, where found.

For the purpose of sections 81-1901 to 81-1936, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 81-1904 to 81-1913 shall be used.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 3.